New York, session 2025-2026, A4683.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 1707 of the education law, as 2 amended by section 6 of part A of chapter 436 of the laws of 1997, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 [1.] The annual organizational meeting of the board of education of 5 every union free school district shall be held [on the first Tuesday] in 6 July on or before the Monday after the twentieth day in July of each 7 year[, unless said day shall be a legal holiday, in which event it shall 8 fall on the first Wednesday in July]. 9 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 1707 of the education law is REPEALED. 10 § 3. Section 1904 of the education law is REPEALED. 11 § 4. Section 2504 of the education law, as added by chapter 762 of the 12 laws of 1950, and subdivision 2 as added and subdivision 3 as renumbered 13 by chapter 526 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 14 § 2504. Meetings of board of education. 1. The annual meeting of the 15 board of education shall be held [during the first week] in July on or 16 before the Monday after the twentieth day in July, at four o'clock in 17 the afternoon or such other hour as the board may determine, at which 18 meeting the board shall select a president for the ensuing year. At such 19 meeting the board may also select a vice-president who shall be author- 20 ized to act for the president in case of the president's absence or 21 inability to act during such year. 22 2. [The board of education may, however, by resolution, determine that 23 the annual meeting be held at any time during the first fifteen days in 24 the month of July, at a time to be decided by the board. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05796-01-5 A. 4683 2 1 3.] Such board shall also fix the day and hour for holding regular 2 board meetings which shall be at least as often as once each month and 3 shall also prescribe a method for calling special meetings of such 4 board. 5 § 5. Paragraph o of subdivision 9-a of section 2502 of the education 6 law, as amended by chapter 526 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read 7 as follows: 8 o. The members so elected to the board of education shall convene on 9 the [first business day in July of each year, unless another] date [is] 10 chosen pursuant to section twenty-five hundred four of this [chapter] 11 article, at the time of the commencement of their term of office and 12 select from their members a president who shall serve for a term of one 13 year. 14 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.